src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NOUN_51nuorikarja

+Pl+Abe:itta{hyph?}karjoitta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:ilta{hyph?}karjoilta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:illa{hyph?}karjoilla  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:ille{hyph?}karjoille  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:ista{hyph?}karjoista  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:ina{hyph?}karjoina  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ien{hyph?}karjojen  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ten{hyph?}karjojen  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:iin{hyph?}karjoihin  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:issa{hyph?}karjoissa  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:et{hyph?}karjat  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:ia{hyph?}karjoja  NOUN_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksi{hyph?}karjoikse  NOUN_BACK_POSS  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksi{hyph?}karjoiksi  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:etta{hyph?}karjatta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:elta{hyph?}karjalta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:ella{hyph?}karjalla  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:elle{hyph?}karjalle  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:esta{hyph?}karjasta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:ena{hyph?}karjana  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:en{hyph?}karjan  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:een{hyph?}karjaan  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:essa{hyph?}karjassa  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:i{hyph?}karja  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:i{hyph?}karja  NOUN_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:ta{hyph?}karjaa  NOUN_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:eksi{hyph?}karjakse  NOUN_BACK_POSS  ;

+Sg+Tra:eksi{hyph?}karjaksi  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NOUN_51nuorimies

+Pl+Abe:itta{hyph?}miehittä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:ilta{hyph?}miehiltä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:illa{hyph?}miehillä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:ille{hyph?}miehille  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:ista{hyph?}miehistä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:ina{hyph?}miehinä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ien{hyph?}miehien  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ten{hyph?}miehien  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:iin{hyph?}miehiin  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:issa{hyph?}miehissä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:et{hyph?}miehet  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:ia{hyph?}miehiä  NOUN_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksi{hyph?}miehikse  NOUN_BACK_POSS  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksi{hyph?}miehiksi  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:etta{hyph?}miehettä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:elta{hyph?}mieheltä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:ella{hyph?}miehellä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:elle{hyph?}miehelle  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:esta{hyph?}miehestä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:ena{hyph?}miehenä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:en{hyph?}miehen  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:een{hyph?}mieheen  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:essa{hyph?}miehessä  NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:i{hyph?}mies  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:i{hyph?}mies  NOUN_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:ta{hyph?}miesä  NOUN_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:eksi{hyph?}miehekse  NOUN_BACK_POSS  ;

+Sg+Tra:eksi{hyph?}mieheksi  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NOUN_51nuoripari

+Pl+Abe:itta{hyph?}pareitta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:ilta{hyph?}pareilta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:illa{hyph?}pareilla  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:ille{hyph?}pareille  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:ista{hyph?}pareista  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:ina{hyph?}pareina  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ien{hyph?}parien  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ten{hyph?}parien  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:iin{hyph?}pareihin  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:issa{hyph?}pareissa  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:et{hyph?}parit  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:ia{hyph?}pareja  NOUN_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksi{hyph?}pareikse  NOUN_BACK_POSS  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksi{hyph?}pareiksi  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:etta{hyph?}paritta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:elta{hyph?}parilta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:ella{hyph?}parilla  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:elle{hyph?}parille  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:esta{hyph?}parista  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:ena{hyph?}parina  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:en{hyph?}parin  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:een{hyph?}pariin  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:essa{hyph?}parissa  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:i{hyph?}pari  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:i{hyph?}pari  NOUN_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:ta{hyph?}paria  NOUN_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:eksi{hyph?}parikse  NOUN_BACK_POSS  ;

+Sg+Tra:eksi{hyph?}pariksi  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NOUN_51omakuva

+Pl+Abe:itta{hyph?}kuvitta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:ilta{hyph?}kuvilta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:illa{hyph?}kuvilla  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:ille{hyph?}kuville  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:ista{hyph?}kuvista  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:ina{hyph?}kuvina  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ien{hyph?}kuvien  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:iin{hyph?}kuviin  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:issa{hyph?}kuvissa  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:at{hyph?}kuvat  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:ia{hyph?}kuvia  NOUN_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksi{hyph?}kuvikse  NOUN_BACK_POSS  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksi{hyph?}kuviksi  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:atta{hyph?}kuvatta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:alta{hyph?}kuvalta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:alla{hyph?}kuvalla  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:alle{hyph?}kuvalle  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:asta{hyph?}kuvasta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:ana{hyph?}kuvana  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:an{hyph?}kuvan  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:aan{hyph?}kuvaan  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:assa{hyph?}kuvassa  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:a{hyph?}kuva  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:a{hyph?}kuva  NOUN_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:aa{hyph?}kuvaa  NOUN_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:aksi{hyph?}kuvakse  NOUN_BACK_POSS  ;

+Sg+Tra:aksi{hyph?}kuvaksi  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NOUN_51omatunto

+Pl+Abe:itta{hyph?}tunnoitta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:ilta{hyph?}tunnoilta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:illa{hyph?}tunnoilla  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:ille{hyph?}tunnoille  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:ista{hyph?}tunnoista  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:ina{hyph?}tuntoina  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ien{hyph?}tuntojen  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:iin{hyph?}tuntoihin  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:issa{hyph?}tunnoissa  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:at{hyph?}tunnot  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:ia{hyph?}tuntoja  NOUN_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksi{hyph?}tunnoikse  NOUN_BACK_POSS  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksi{hyph?}tunnoiksi  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:atta{hyph?}tunnotta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:alta{hyph?}tunnolta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:alla{hyph?}tunnolla  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:alle{hyph?}tunnolle  NOUN_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:asta{hyph?}tunnosta  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:ana{hyph?}tuntona  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:an{hyph?}tunnon  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:aan{hyph?}tuntoon  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:assa{hyph?}tunnossa  NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:a{hyph?}tunto  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:aa{hyph?}tuntoa  NOUN_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:aksi{hyph?}tunnokse  NOUN_BACK_POSS  ;

+Sg+Tra:aksi{hyph?}tunnoksi  NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
