src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NOUN_Cmp
nuorikarja+N:nuor  NOUN_51nuorikarja  ;
nuorimies+N:nuor  NOUN_51nuorimies  ;
nuoripari+N:nuor  NOUN_51nuoripari  ;
omakuva+N:om  NOUN_51omakuva  ;
omatunto+N:om  NOUN_51omatunto  ;
